Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 80. State Commission for Human Rights.

Administrative Code. —

For rules governing practice and procedure before the state commission for human rights, see 6 AAC 30.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 63, SLA 2006 (SB 132), proposing amendments to the investigation and procedure laws applicable to the State Commission for Human Rights to give the commission more enforcement discretion, see 2005 Senate Journal 487 — 490.

Opinions of attorney general. —

While the Alaska supreme court has stated that antidiscrimination legislation enacted in Alaska is not substantially similar to comparable federal laws, the overall conceptual approach of the federal scheme is similar to Alaska’s. May 14, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska State Commission for Human Rights executive director has the initial responsibility for deciding jurisdictional questions; the law is silent on the authority of the commissioners to make such a decision in the absence of investigation and conciliation efforts relevant to the complaint.
January 4, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

Alaska Const., art. I, § 3, as implemented by this chapter probably prohibits the state from enacting any laws or adopting any regulations giving special hunting privileges to a class of citizens consisting of Eskimos, Aleuts and Indians only.
January 21, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

There is justification for the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to require specifically, in wholly state funded contracts, that a prime contractor make substantial and good faith efforts to meet a goal of awarding a given percentage of the dollar value of the contract to minority business enterprise subcontractors. March 23, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.